Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1576.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 704.1(a) introductory paragraph, (2), (4) and (5) and 709.2(b) of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended to read:Section 704.1. Payments to Counties for Services to Children.--(a) The department shall reimburse county institution districts or their successors for expenditures incurred by them in the performance of their obligation pursuant to this act and [the act of December 6, 1972 (P.L.1464, No.333), known as the "Juvenile Act,"] 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters) in the following percentages:* * *(2) No less than seventy-five percent and no more than 12345678910111213141516171819 ninety percent of the reasonable cost including staff costs of child welfare services, informal adjustment services provided pursuant to [section 8 of the act of December 6, 1972 (P.L.1464, No.333), known as the "Juvenile Act,"] 42 Pa.C.S. § 6323 (relating to informal adjustment) and such services approved by the department, including but not limited to, foster home care, group home care, shelter care, community residential care, youth service bureaus, day treatment centers and service to children in their own home and any other alternative treatment programs approved by the department.* * *(4) Fifty percent of the actual cost of care and support of a child placed by a county child welfare agency or a child committed by a court pursuant to [the act of December 6, 1972 (P.L.1464, No.333), known as the "Juvenile Act,"] 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 to the legal custody of a public or private agency approved or operated by the department other than those services described in clause (2). The Auditor General shall ascertain the actual expense for fiscal year 1974-1975 and each year thereafter by the [Department of Public Welfare] department for each of the several counties and each city of the first class whose children resident within the county or city of the first class directly received the benefit of the Commonwealth's expenditure. The Auditor General shall also ascertain for each Commonwealth institution or facility rendering services to delinquent or deprived children the actual average daily cost of providing said services. The Auditor General shall certify to each county and city of the first class the allocated Commonwealth expenditures incurred on behalf of its children and notify the [Secretary of Public Welfare] secretary and each 20250HB1576PN1863 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 county and city of the first class of same.(5) [Fifty] As follows:(i) Fifty percent of the [reasonable] following costs incurred in proceedings under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63:(A) Reasonable cost of medical and other examinations and treatment of a child ordered by the court [pursuant to the act of December 6, 1972 (P.L.1464, No.333), known as the "Juvenile Act," and the expenses of the appointment of a guardian pendente lite, summons, warrants, notices, subpoenas, travel expenses of witnesses, transportation of the child, and other like expenses incurred in proceedings under the act of December 6, 1972 (P.L.1464, No.333), known as the "Juvenile Act."].(B) The appointment of a guardian ad litem for a child in the context of dependency proceedings.(C) The appointment of counsel for a child in the context of dependency proceedings.(D) The appointment of counsel for an indigent child in the context of delinquency proceedings.(E) The appointment of an educational attorney or advocate for an indigent child involved in delinquency or dependency proceedings.(F) The appointment and training of counsel for an indigent youth in the context of criminal proceedings.(G) Summons, warrants, notices, subpoenas, travel expenses of witnesses and transportation of the child.(H) Other similar expenses incurred in proceedings.(ii) The intent of the reimbursements authorized under subclause (i)(C), (D), (E) and (F) is to supplement and not supplant necessary funding for required juvenile counsel or counsel for youth in criminal or dependency proceedings.20250HB1576PN1863 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) The following apply to money reimbursed to the counties under subclause (i)(C) and (D):(A) A county shall include in the county's needs-based budget required by section 709.1 the purposes for which the money will be used.(B) A county shall prioritize expenditures of the money in ways that are designed to maintain, enhance or improve the quantity or quality of legal services provided to juveniles in accordance with national best practices in defense funding.* * *Section 709.2. Review of County Submissions.--* * *(b) The department determination shall consider whether the county's budget [is]:(1) Is reasonable in relation to past costs, projected cost increases, number of children in the county and the number of children served, service level trends and projections of other sources of revenue.(2) Prioritizes expenditures of the money reimbursed to the county in accordance with section 704.1(a)(5)(i)(C), (D), (E) and (F) to supplement and not supplant necessary county funding for required juvenile counsel or counsel for youths in criminal proceedings in ways that are designed to maintain, enhance or improve the quantity or quality of legal services provided to juveniles or youths in criminal or delinquency proceedings in accordance with national best practices in defense funding.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1576PN1863 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627